Illinois, session 104th, SB3402.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 8-173 and by adding Section 8-173.2 as 6follows: 7    (40 ILCS 5/8-173)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 8-173)8    Sec. 8-173. Financing; tax levy. 9    (a) Except as provided in subsection (f) of this Section, 10the city council of the city shall levy a tax annually upon all 11taxable property in the city at a rate that will produce a sum 12which, when added to the amounts deducted from the salaries of 13the employees or otherwise contributed by them and the amounts 14deposited under subsection (f), will be sufficient for the 15requirements of this Article, but which when extended will 16produce an amount not to exceed the greater of the following: 17(a) the sum obtained by the levy of a tax of .1093% of the 18value, as equalized or assessed by the Department of Revenue, 19of all taxable property within such city, or (b) the sum of 20$12,000,000. However any city in which a Fund has been 21established and in operation under this Article for more than 223 years prior to 1970 shall levy for the year 1970 a tax at a 23rate on the dollar of assessed valuation of all taxable   SB3402- 2 -LRB104 18509 RPS 31951 b1property that will produce, when extended, an amount not to 2exceed 1.2 times the total amount of contributions made by 3employees to the Fund for annuity purposes in the calendar 4year 1968, and, for the year 1971 and 1972 such levy that will 5produce, when extended, an amount not to exceed 1.3 times the 6total amount of contributions made by employees to the Fund 7for annuity purposes in the calendar years 1969 and 1970, 8respectively; and for the year 1973 an amount not to exceed 91.365 times such total amount of contributions made by 10employees for annuity purposes in the calendar year 1971; and 11for the year 1974 an amount not to exceed 1.430 times such 12total amount of contributions made by employees for annuity 13purposes in the calendar year 1972; and for the year 1975 an 14amount not to exceed 1.495 times such total amount of 15contributions made by employees for annuity purposes in the 16calendar year 1973; and for the year 1976 an amount not to 17exceed 1.560 times such total amount of contributions made by 18employees for annuity purposes in the calendar year 1974; and 19for the year 1977 an amount not to exceed 1.625 times such 20total amount of contributions made by employees for annuity 21purposes in the calendar year 1975; and for the year 1978 and 22each year thereafter through levy year 2016, such levy as will 23produce, when extended, an amount not to exceed the total 24amount of contributions made by or on behalf of employees to 25the Fund for annuity purposes in the calendar year 2 years 26prior to the year for which the annual applicable tax is   SB3402- 3 -LRB104 18509 RPS 31951 b1levied, multiplied by 1.690 for the years 1978 through 1998 2and by 1.250 for the year 1999 and for each year thereafter 3through levy year 2016. Beginning in levy year 2017, and in 4each year thereafter, the levy shall not exceed the amount of 5the city's total required contribution to the Fund for the 6next payment year, as determined under subsection (a-5). For 7the purposes of this Section, the payment year is the year 8immediately following the levy year.9    The tax shall be levied and collected in like manner with 10the general taxes of the city, and shall be exclusive of and in 11addition to the amount of tax the city is now or may hereafter 12be authorized to levy for general purposes under any laws 13which may limit the amount of tax which the city may levy for 14general purposes. The county clerk of the county in which the 15city is located, in reducing tax levies under the provisions 16of any Act concerning the levy and extension of taxes, shall 17not consider the tax herein provided for as a part of the 18general tax levy for city purposes, and shall not include the 19same within any limitation of the percent of the assessed 20valuation upon which taxes are required to be extended for 21such city.22    Revenues derived from such tax shall be paid to the city 23treasurer of the city as collected and held by the city 24treasurer for the benefit of the fund.25    If the payments on account of taxes are insufficient 26during any year to meet the requirements of this Article, the   SB3402- 4 -LRB104 18509 RPS 31951 b1city may issue tax anticipation warrants against the current 2tax levy.3    The city may continue to use other lawfully available 4funds in lieu of all or part of the levy, as provided under 5subsection (f) of this Section.6    (a-5) (1) Beginning in payment year 2018, the city's 7required annual contribution to the Fund for payment years 82018 through 2022 shall be: for 2018, $266,000,000; for 2019, 9$344,000,000; for 2020, $421,000,000; for 2021, $499,000,000; 10and for 2022, $576,000,000.11    (2) For payment years 2023 through 2058, the city's 12required annual contribution to the Fund shall be the amount 13determined by the Fund to be equal to the sum of (i) the city's 14portion of the projected normal cost for that fiscal year, 15plus (ii) an amount determined on a level percentage of 16applicable employee payroll basis (reflecting any limits on 17individual participants' pay that apply for benefit and 18contribution purposes under this plan) that is sufficient to 19bring the total actuarial assets of the Fund up to 90% of the 20total actuarial liabilities of the Fund by the end of 2058, 21minus (iii) the amount required to be contributed by the Board 22of Education of the city under Section 8-173.2.23    (3) For payment years after 2058, the city's required 24annual contribution to the Fund shall be equal to the amount, 25if any, needed to bring the total actuarial assets of the Fund 26up to 90% of the total actuarial liabilities of the Fund as of   SB3402- 5 -LRB104 18509 RPS 31951 b1the end of the year. In making the determinations under 2paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, the actuarial 3calculations shall be determined under the entry age normal 4actuarial cost method, and any actuarial gains or losses from 5investment return incurred in a fiscal year shall be 6recognized in equal annual amounts over the 5-year period 7following the fiscal year.8    To the extent that the city's contribution for any of the 9payment years referenced in this subsection is made with 10property taxes, those property taxes shall be levied, 11collected, and paid to the Fund in a like manner with the 12general taxes of the city.13    (a-10) If the city fails to transmit to the Fund 14contributions required of it under this Article by December 31 15of the year in which such contributions are due, the Fund may, 16after giving notice to the city, certify to the State 17Comptroller the amounts of the delinquent payments, and the 18Comptroller must, beginning in payment year 2018, deduct and 19deposit into the Fund the certified amounts or a portion of 20those amounts from the following proportions of grants of 21State funds to the city: 22        (1) in payment year 2018, one-third of the total 23    amount of any grants of State funds to the city; 24        (2) in payment year 2019, two-thirds of the total 25    amount of any grants of State funds to the city; and 26        (3) in payment year 2020 and each payment year   SB3402- 6 -LRB104 18509 RPS 31951 b1    thereafter, the total amount of any grants of State funds 2    to the city. 3    The State Comptroller may not deduct from any grants of 4State funds to the city more than the amount of delinquent 5payments certified to the State Comptroller by the Fund. 6    (b) On or before July 1, 2017, and each July 1 thereafter, 7the board shall certify to the city council the annual amounts 8required under this Article, for which the tax herein provided 9shall be levied for the following year. The board shall 10compute the amounts necessary to be credited to the reserves 11established and maintained as herein provided, and shall make 12an annual determination of the amount of the required city 13contributions, and certify the results thereof to the city 14council.15    (c) In respect to employees of the city who are 16transferred to the employment of a park district by virtue of 17the "Exchange of Functions Act of 1957", the corporate 18authorities of the park district shall annually levy a tax 19upon all the taxable property in the park district at such rate 20per cent of the value of such property, as equalized or 21assessed by the Department of Revenue, as shall be sufficient, 22when added to the amounts deducted from their salaries and 23otherwise contributed by them to provide the benefits to which 24they and their dependents and beneficiaries are entitled under 25this Article. The city shall not levy a tax hereunder in 26respect to such employees.  SB3402- 7 -LRB104 18509 RPS 31951 b1    The tax so levied by the park district shall be in addition 2to and exclusive of all other taxes authorized to be levied by 3the park district for corporate, annuity fund, or other 4purposes. The county clerk of the county in which the park 5district is located, in reducing any tax levied under the 6provisions of any act concerning the levy and extension of 7taxes shall not consider such tax as part of the general tax 8levy for park purposes, and shall not include the same in any 9limitation of the per cent of the assessed valuation upon 10which taxes are required to be extended for the park district. 11The proceeds of the tax levied by the park district, upon 12receipt by the district, shall be immediately paid over to the 13city treasurer of the city for the uses and purposes of the 14fund.15    The various sums to be contributed by the city and park 16district and allocated for the purposes of this Article, and 17any interest to be contributed by the city, shall be derived 18from the revenue from the taxes authorized in this Section or 19otherwise as expressly provided in this Section.20    If it is not possible or practicable for the city to make 21contributions for age and service annuity and widow's annuity 22at the same time that employee contributions are made for such 23purposes, such city contributions shall be construed to be due 24and payable as of the end of the fiscal year for which the tax 25is levied and shall accrue thereafter with interest at the 26effective rate until paid.  SB3402- 8 -LRB104 18509 RPS 31951 b1    (d) With respect to employees whose wages are funded as 2participants under the Comprehensive Employment and Training 3Act of 1973, as amended (P.L. 93-203, 87 Stat. 839, P.L. 493-567, 88 Stat. 1845), hereinafter referred to as CETA, 5subsequent to October 1, 1978, and in instances where the 6board has elected to establish a manpower program reserve, the 7board shall compute the amounts necessary to be credited to 8the manpower program reserves established and maintained as 9herein provided, and shall make a periodic determination of 10the amount of required contributions from the City to the 11reserve to be reimbursed by the federal government in 12accordance with rules and regulations established by the 13Secretary of the United States Department of Labor or his 14designee, and certify the results thereof to the City Council. 15Any such amounts shall become a credit to the City and will be 16used to reduce the amount which the City would otherwise 17contribute during succeeding years for all employees.18    (e) In lieu of establishing a manpower program reserve 19with respect to employees whose wages are funded as 20participants under the Comprehensive Employment and Training 21Act of 1973, as authorized by subsection (d), the board may 22elect to establish a special municipality contribution rate 23for all such employees. If this option is elected, the City 24shall contribute to the Fund from federal funds provided under 25the Comprehensive Employment and Training Act program at the 26special rate so established and such contributions shall   SB3402- 9 -LRB104 18509 RPS 31951 b1become a credit to the City and be used to reduce the amount 2which the City would otherwise contribute during succeeding 3years for all employees.4    (f) In lieu of levying all or a portion of the tax required 5under this Section in any year, the city may deposit with the 6city treasurer for the benefit of the fund, to be held in 7accordance with this Article, an amount that, together with 8the taxes levied under this Section for that year, is not less 9than the amount of the city contributions for that year as 10certified by the board to the city council. The deposit may be 11derived from any source legally available for that purpose, 12including, but not limited to, the proceeds of city 13borrowings. The making of a deposit shall satisfy fully the 14requirements of this Section for that year to the extent of the 15amounts so deposited. Amounts deposited under this subsection 16may be used by the fund for any of the purposes for which the 17proceeds of the tax levied by the city under this Section may 18be used, including the payment of any amount that is otherwise 19required by this Article to be paid from the proceeds of that 20tax.21(Source: P.A. 100-23, eff. 7-6-17.) 22    (40 ILCS 5/8-173.2 new)23    Sec. 8-173.2. Required employer contributions by the Board 24of Education of the city. Beginning February 1, 2027, the 25Board of Education of the city, rather than the city, is   SB3402- 10 -LRB104 18509 RPS 31951 b1required to make the following annual contributions to the 2pension fund:3        (1) a contribution equal to the normal cost for all 4    the employees of the Board of Education of the city under 5    this Article who are employed by the Board of Education of 6    the city on and after the effective date of this 7    amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly; and8        (2) notwithstanding any other provision of law, an 9    apportioned contribution toward the unfunded actuarial 10    accrued liability of the Fund, as calculated under 11    paragraph (2) of subsection (a-5) of Section 8-173, equal 12    to the percentage of the Fund's total current unfunded 13    liability that is attributable to service credit earned by 14    employees of the Board of Education of the city prior to 15    January 1, 1994. The amount of such liability shall be 16    determined by the Fund's actuary and amortized in a manner 17    consistent with the statutory funding schedule applicable 18    to the Fund, including the requirement to achieve a funded 19    ratio of not less than 90% by the applicable target year. 20    Contributions required under this paragraph (2) shall 21    constitute employer contributions of the Board of 22    Education of the city and shall be in addition to any 23    required normal cost contributions for service rendered on 24    and after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 25    104th General Assembly.   SB3402- 11 -LRB104 18509 RPS 31951 b1    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding 2Section 8.50 as follows: 3    (30 ILCS 805/8.50 new)4    Sec. 8.50. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 58 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for 6the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory 7Act of the 104th General Assembly. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.